Florida, session 2026, SB326.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 20 21 Section 1.âSection 733.501, Florida Statutes, is amended to 22 read: 23 733.501âCurators.â 24 (1)âAPPOINTMENT OF A CURATOR.âWhen it is necessary, the 25 court may appoint a curator after formal notice to the person 26 apparently entitled to letters of administration as follows: 27 (a)âThe court may appoint a curator at any time with notice 28 to other interested persons as the court deems appropriate. The 29 curator may be authorized to perform any duty or function of a 30 personal representative. 31 (b)âIf there is significant great danger that any of the 32 decedentâs property is likely to be wasted, destroyed, or 33 removed beyond the jurisdiction of the court and if the 34 appointment of a curator would be delayed by giving notice, the 35 court may appoint a curator without giving notice to other 36 interested persons. 37 (c)âIn any other proper case, the court may appoint a 38 curator when deemed necessary to protect the interests of the 39 estate or a decedentâs heirs. 40 (2)âAUTHORITY AND DUTIES OF THE CURATOR.â 41 (a)âThe curator has the same authority and powers as set 42 forth in this part. 43 (b)âWithin a reasonable time after the curatorâs 44 appointment by the court, the curator must take possession and 45 control of the estate of the decedent in any of the following 46 circumstances: 47 1.âWhen a decedent dies intestate in the county without 48 heirs. 49 2.âWhen a decedent dies leaving a will, and the personal 50 representative named is absent or fails to qualify. 51 3.âWhen an unknown decedent dies or is found dead in the 52 county. 53 4.âFor any other cause in which the court finds it 54 necessary to protect the estate from injury, waste, theft, loss, 55 or mismanagement. 56 (c)âThe curator shall act as trustee when appointed by the 57 court Bond shall be required of the curator as the court deems 58 necessary. No bond shall be required of banks and trust 59 companies as curators. 60 (3)âBOND REQUIREMENTS.âUnless waived by the court, curators 61 must post a reasonable bond in an amount to be determined by the 62 court. However, bonds are not required for banks and trust 63 companies that serve as curators. 64 (4)âCOMPENSATION.âCurators are shall be allowed reasonable 65 compensation for their services, and the court may consider the 66 provisions of s. 733.617. 67 (5)(4)âREMOVAL AND SURCHARGE.âCurators are shall be subject 68 to removal and surcharge by the court. 69 (6)âPERIODIC COURT REVIEW.â 70 (a)âThe curator shall file reports with the court. Such 71 reports must detail the actions taken by the curator in managing 72 the estate. The court shall review such reports to ensure that 73 the curator is effectively managing the estate and fulfilling 74 its duties. 75 (b)âThe court may require more frequent reporting or 76 additional documentation as it deems necessary to protect the 77 interests of the estate. 78 Section 2.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 79 made by this act to section 733.501, Florida Statutes, in a 80 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 90.5021, Florida 81 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 82 90.5021âFiduciary lawyer-client privilege.â 83 (1)âFor the purpose of this section, a client acts as a 84 fiduciary when serving as a personal representative or a trustee 85 as defined in ss. 731.201 and 736.0103, an administrator ad 86 litem as described in s. 733.308, a curator as described in s. 87 733.501, a guardian or guardian ad litem as defined in s. 88 744.102, a conservator as defined in s. 710.102, or an attorney 89 in fact as described in chapter 709. 90 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.